Oklahoma, session 2026, SB334.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 61 O.S. 2021, Section 103, as


amended by Section 23, Chapter 228, O.S.L. 2022 (61 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 103), is amended to read as follows:


Section 103. A. Unless otherwise provided by law, all public


construction contracts exceeding One Hundred Thousand Dollars


($100,000.00) or construction management trade contracts or


subcontracts exceeding Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) shall be


let and awarded to the lowest responsible bidder, by open


competitive bidding after solicitation for sealed bids, in


accordance with the provisions of the Public Competitive Bidding Act


of 1974. No work shall be commenced until a written contract is

Req. No. 174 Page 1


executed and all required bonds and insurance have been provided by


the contractor to the awarding public agency.


B. Notwithstanding subsection A of this section, in awarding


public construction contracts exceeding One Hundred Thousand Dollars


($100,000.00) or construction management trade contracts or


subcontracts exceeding Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00),


counties, cities, other local units of government and any public


trust with a county or a municipality as its sole beneficiary may


provide for a local bid preference of not more than five percent


(5%) of the bid price if the awarding public agency determines that


there is an economic benefit to the local area or economy.


Provided, however, the local bidder or contractor must agree to


perform the contract for the same price and terms as the bid


proposed by the nonlocal bidder or contractor. Any bid preference


granted hereunder must be in accordance with an established policy


adopted by the governing body of the awarding public agency to


clearly demonstrate the economic benefit to the local area or


economy. Provided, further, no local bid preference shall be


granted unless the local bidding entity is the second lowest


qualified bid on the contract. The bid specifications shall clearly


state that the bid is subject to a local bidder preference law. For


purposes of this section, “local bid” means the bidding person is


authorized to transact business in this state and maintains a bona


fide establishment for transacting such business within this state.

Req. No. 174 Page 2


This provision does not apply to any construction contract for which


federal funds are available for expenditure when its provisions may


be in conflict with federal law or regulation.


C. Except as provided in subsection E of this section, other


construction contracts for the purpose of making any public


improvements or constructing any public building or making repairs


to the same for One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) or less


shall be let and awarded to the lowest responsible bidder by receipt


of written bids or awarded on the basis of competitive quotes to the


lowest responsible qualified contractor. Work may be commenced in


accordance with the purchasing policies of the public agency.


D. Except as provided in subsection E of this section, other


construction contracts for less than Ten Thousand Dollars


($10,000.00) Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) may be


negotiated with a qualified contractor. Work may be commenced in


accordance with the purchasing policies of the public agency.


E. The provisions of this subsection shall apply to public


construction for minor maintenance or minor repair work to public


school district property. Other construction contracts for less


than Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) may be negotiated


with a qualified contractor. Construction contracts equal to or


greater than Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) but less than One


Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) shall be let and awarded to


the lowest responsible bidder by receipt of written bids. No work

Req. No. 174 Page 3


shall be commenced on any construction contract until a written


contract is executed and proof of insurance has been provided by the


contractor to the awarding public agency.


F. The Construction and Properties Division of the Office of


Management and Enterprise Services may award contracts using best


value competitive proposals. As used in this subsection, “best


value” means an optional contract award system which can evaluate


and rank submitted competitive performance proposals to identify the


proposal with the greatest value to the state. The Office of


Management and Enterprise Services, pursuant to the Administrative


Procedures Act, shall promulgate rules necessary to implement the


provisions of this subsection.


G. 1. A public agency shall not let or award a public


construction contract exceeding One Hundred Thousand Dollars


($100,000.00) or a construction management trade contract or


subcontract exceeding Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) to any


contractor affiliated with a purchasing cooperative unless the


purchasing cooperative and the contractor have complied with all of


the provisions of the Public Competitive Bidding Act of 1974,


including, but not limited to, open competitive bidding after


solicitation for sealed bids. A public agency shall not let or


award a public construction contract exceeding Ten Thousand Dollars


($10,000.00) up to One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) to any


contractor affiliated with a purchasing cooperative unless the

Req. No. 174 Page 4


purchasing cooperative and the contractor have complied with all of


the provisions of the Public Competitive Bidding Act of 1974,


including submission of a written bid upon notice of competitive


bidding.


2. A purchasing cooperative and its affiliated contractors


shall not be allowed to bid on any public construction contract


exceeding One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) or any


construction management trade contract or subcontract exceeding


Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) unless the purchasing


cooperative and its affiliated contractors have complied with all of


the provisions of the Public Competitive Bidding Act of 1974,


including, but not limited to, open competitive bidding after


solicitation for sealed bids. A purchasing cooperative and its


affiliated contractors shall not be allowed to bid on any public


construction contract exceeding Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00)


unless the purchasing cooperative and its affiliated contractors


have complied with all of the provisions of the Public Competitive


Bidding Act of 1974, including submission of a written bid upon


notice of open competitive bidding.


3. Local governmental units, or local governmental units


cooperating under the terms of any interlocal cooperative agreement


authorized by state law, may create a purchasing cooperative or


contract with a purchasing cooperative to provide leverage in


achieving best value or the best terms in contracts. To encourage

Req. No. 174 Page 5


intergovernmental collaboration, any purchasing cooperative or


interlocal cooperative entity may utilize any single legal newspaper


of this state to serve as sufficient compliance for bid notice


requirements of competitive bidding or solicitation of bids. If the


purchasing cooperative or interlocal cooperative entity is engaging


in a project exclusive to a county or group of counties of this


state, and not open to all governmental units or public trusts that


wish to participate statewide, the bid notice shall be published in


a legal newspaper located within the county or group of counties.


Any local governmental unit or public trust that enters into


membership or contracts with a purchasing cooperative or interlocal


cooperative entity may enter into purchases or contracts under the


terms negotiated by the purchasing cooperative or interlocal


cooperative entity. If the purchasing cooperative or interlocal


cooperative entity complies with the requirements of this section of


law, all local governmental units shall be deemed in compliance with


the requirements set forth for bid notices and publication.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-174 RD 1/2/2025 3:39:57 PM

Req. No. 174 Page 6